zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 尿布相关用品 > 纸尿裤桶: 尿布处理系统; 尿布垃圾桶
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Vaippatarvikkeet > Vaipparoskikset: Vaippojen hävittämisjärjestelmät; Vaipparoskakorit
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Ornamentação > Contentores de fraldas: Sistemas de eliminação de fraldas; Caixotes de lixo para fraldas
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Przewijanie > Kubły na pieluchy: Systemy do zużytych pieluch; Kosze na zużyte pieluchy
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Pelenaštvo > Kante za pelene: Sustavi za odlaganje pelena; Kante za smeće za pelene
it: Bebè e bimbi > Cambio pannolini > Secchi per pannolini: Sistemi di smaltimento pannolini; Bidoni della spazzatura per pannolini
da: Baby og småbørn > Bleskift > Blespande: Systemer til bortskaffelse af bleer; Bleskraldespande
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Tã/bỉm > Thùng đựng tã/bỉm bẩn: Hệ thống xử lý tã/bỉm; Thùng rác đựng tã/bỉm
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Смяна на пелени > Кошове за пелени: Системи за изхвърляне на пелени; Кошчета за пелени
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Vystymas > Sauskelnių kibirai: Sauskelnių šalinimo sistemos; Sauskelnių šiukšliadėžės
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Wickelbedarf > Windeleimer: Windelentsorgungssysteme; Windel-Mülleimer
en: Baby & Toddler > Diapering > Diaper Pails: Diaper Disposal Systems; Diaper Trash Cans
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Previjanje > Koši za plenice: Sistemi za odstranjevanje plenic; Koši za plenice
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Αλλαγή πάνας > Κάδοι απορριμμάτων για πάνες: Συστήματα απόρριψης πάνας; Κάδοι απορριμμάτων πάνας
sv: Baby och småbarn > Blöjbyte > Blöjhinkar: Avfallshanteringssystem för blöjor; Papperskorg för blöjor
ja: ベビー用品 > おむつ用品 > おむつ処理ポット: おむつ処理システム; おむつ用ゴミ箱
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 尿布 > 尿布桶: 尿布處理系統; 尿布垃圾桶
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Pelenkázás > Pelenkavödrök: Pelenkaártalmatlanító rendszerek; Pelenka szemeteskukák
nb: Baby og barn > Bleieutstyr > Bleiebøtter: Bleieavfallssystemer; Bleiesøppeldunker
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Articole scutece > Coșuri pentru scutece: Sisteme pentru eliminarea scutecelor; Coșuri de gunoi pentru scutece
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Change de bébé > Seaux à couches: Systèmes d’élimination des couches; Poubelles à couches
ru: Товары для детей > Пеленание > Накопители для подгузников: Утилизаторы для подгузников; Мусорные ведра для подгузников
ko: 영유아 > 기저귀용품 > 기저귀 휴지통: 기저귀 처리 장치; 기저귀 쓰레기통
nl: Baby en peuter > Luiermaterialen > Luieremmers: Systemen voor luierafval; Luiervuilnisbakken
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Bebek Alt Alma Ürünleri > Bebek Bezi Çöp Kovası Sistemi: Bebek Bezi İmha Sistemleri; Bebek Bezi Çöp Kovaları
pt-BR: Infantil > Troca de fraldas > Lixeira para fraldas: Sistemas de descarte de fraldas; Latas de lixo para fraldas
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > การเปลี่ยนผ้าอ้อม > ที่ใส่ผ้าอ้อมใช้แล้ว: ระบบกำจัดผ้าอ้อม; ถังขยะใส่ผ้าอ้อม
sk-SK: Bábätká > Prebaľovanie > Koše na plienky: Systémy na likvidáciu plienok; Odpadkové koše na plienky
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Pañales y cuidado del bebé > Contenedores de pañales: Sistemas de eliminación de pañales; Botes de basura para pañales
cs: Děti a kojenci > Přebalování > Koše na plenky: Systémy pro likvidaci plenek; Odpadkové koše na pleny